Hawaii statutes.
§121-22 Warrants of noncommissioned
officers. The warrants of noncommissioned officers and appointments of
private first-class and rated specialists shall be continued in force after
discharge by reason of expiration of term of service if they reenlist on the
day following their discharge and the vacancy caused by their discharge has not
been filled. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-22]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next